District of Columbia statutes.
50-1731.09

Reporting requirements.

(a)

The Director of the District Department of Transportation shall annually publish and submit to the Council a report containing statistics regarding the possible relationship between motor vehicle accidents in the District of Columbia and the use of mobile telephones or other electronic devices by motor vehicle operators.

(b)

The Mayor shall, within 2 years and 6 months after March 30, 2004, submit a report to the Council containing recommendations concerning the use of mobile telephones or other electronic devices in motor vehicles. The report shall include a recommendation as to whether the provisions of this chapter should be amended.

Mar. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-124, § 9, 51 DCR 1541